Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-946
Statement of policy.

It is the policy of the State of Nebraska:

(1) To protect the fundamental right of an individual to pursue a lawful occupation;

(2) To use the least restrictive regulation which is necessary to protect consumers from undue risk of present, significant, and substantiated harms that clearly threaten or endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the public when competition alone is not sufficient and which is consistent with the public interest;

(3) To enforce an occupational regulation against an individual only to the extent that the individual sells goods or services that are included explicitly in the statutes that govern the occupation;

(4) To construe and apply occupational regulations to increase opportunities, promote competition, and encourage innovation;

(5) To use the least restrictive method of regulation as set out in section 71-6222 for lawful occupations subject to the Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act; and

(6) To provide ongoing legislative review of occupational regulations.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 14.

Nebraska Regulation of Health Professions Act, see section 71-6201.